Tennessee, session 114, SB0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-101, is amended by designating
subsection (c) as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following new subdivisions:
(2) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, in the event of a public health
emergency, natural disaster, or other temporary office closure, a county clerk may
request a county clerk in a contiguous county for assistance with vehicle registrations,
renewal of registrations, and services pursuant to § 55-6-104(a)(1). The request must
be in writing and delivered to the county clerk by standard mail, electronic mail, or
facsimile, and must specify a period of time for which assistance is requested. Upon
receiving a request for assistance, the county clerk may complete vehicle registrations,
renewal of registrations, and services pursuant to § 55-6-104(a)(1) for the time period
set forth in the request. The county clerk who aids the requesting county clerk shall not
collect county-specific motor vehicle privilege taxes, as applicable. The aiding county
clerk shall provide the requesting county clerk with a report of vehicles registered during
the period of assistance if such report is requested for tax collection purposes.
(3) For issuing certificates of registration and registration plates, for transferring
registration plates from one (1) motor vehicle to another and issuing a certificate for the
same, for accepting for surrender certificates of registration and registration plates, for
each set of registration plates and certificates of registration, a county clerk providing aid
SB0660
002023
- 1 -

pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) is entitled to charge to and receive from applicants the
sum of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) as required under § 55-6-104(a)(1).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002023